test/cgspell/analyser.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
% Interj
% CLB
% CC
% Adv
% Err/Orth-a-á
% V
% TV
% Ind
% Prs
% Pl1
% Inf
% Sem/Dummytag
% Attr
% A
% N
% Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt
% Err/Orth
% Pl
% Com
% Sem/Sign
% ABBR
% Sg
% Acc
% Gen
% Nom
% Der/muš
% IV
%#
% Cmp
% Cmp/SgNom
% Ill
% Imprt
% Sg2


LEXICON Root
hm% Interj:Hm #;
,% CLB:, #;
ja% CC:Ja #;
seammás% Err/Orth-a-á% Adv:seammas #;
ballat% V% TV% Ind% Prs% Pl1:ballat #;
ballat% V% TV% Inf:ballat #;
ballat% V% TV% Imprt% Sg2:balat #;
ballat% V% TV% Err/Orth:balmat #;
ođas% A% Sem/Dummytag% Attr:ođđa #;
diehtu% N% Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt% Err/Orth% Pl% Com:dieđuiguin #;
diehtu% N% Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt% Pl% Com:dieđuiguin #;
skuvla% N% Sg#busse% N% Sg:skuvlabusse #;
.% CLB:. #;
n% N% Sem/Sign% ABBR% Attr:n #;
n% N% Sem/Sign% ABBR% Sg% Acc:n #;
n% N% Sem/Sign% ABBR% Sg% Gen:n #;
n% N% Sem/Sign% ABBR% Sg% Nom:n #;
